Utah statutes.
4-29-2.   Restrictions on importation of chickens, turkeys, chicks, turkey
poults, and hatching eggs -- Certificate to accompany shipment -- Disposition
of nonconforming shipments.
(1) No chickens, turkeys, chicks, turkey poults, or hatching eggs to be used
for breeding purposes shall be imported to this state, or sold by hatcheries
or others within this state unless they originate from flocks participating in
the pullorum control and eradication phase of the National Poultry Improvement
Plan, or the National Turkey Improvement Plan, or have passed a negative
agglutination blood test for pullorum disease administered under the
supervision of the department within 12 months prior to the date of sale.
(2)  Baby chicks, turkey poults, or hatching eggs to be used for purposes
other than breeding shall not be imported to this state, or sold by hatcheries
or others within this state unless they originate from flocks participating in
the pullorum control and eradication phase of the National Poultry Improvement
Plan, or the National Turkey Improvement Plan, or have passed a negative
agglutination blood test for pullorum disease administered under supervision
of the department within 12 months prior to the date of sale.
(3)  A certificate issued by the appropriate authority of the "state of
origin" shall accompany each shipment of hatching eggs, baby chicks, poults,
started chicks, started poults, or chicken or turkey breed stock imported to
this state. The certificate shall specify that the contents of the shipment is
free of pullorum or other poultry disease, the name and address of the
consignee in this state, the name and address of the person who consigned the
poultry for shipment, the name of the certifying authority in the state of
origin, and the date the test or inspection for pullorum was performed by such
authority.
(4)  The department may seize and destroy any shipment of chickens, chicks,
turkeys, poults, or hatching eggs transported into this state in contravention
of this section without notice to the person who consigned the poultry for
shipment to this state, or it may return the contents of the shipment to such
person at the latter's expense.
